Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-475
Owner, defined.

Owner shall mean a person who holds legal title to a motor vehicle, a mortgagor entitled to the possession of a motor vehicle, or the conditional vendee or lessee of a motor vehicle which is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease of the motor vehicle with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 25.